Washington statutes.
RCW 35.22.570

Omnibus grant of powers to first-class cities.

Any city adopting a charter under the provisions of this chapter shall have all the powers which are conferred upon incorporated cities and towns by this title or other laws of the state, and all such powers as are usually exercised by municipal corporations of like character and degree.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.22.570. Prior: 1890 p 224 s 7; RRS s 8981.]